Utah statutes.
78B-5-304.   Stay.

(1)  If an appeal from a foreign judgment is pending, the time for appeal has not expired, or a stay of execution has been granted, the court, upon proof that the judgment debtor has furnished security for satisfaction of the judgment in the state in which the judgment was rendered shall stay enforcement of the judgment until the appeal is concluded, the time for appeal expires, or until the stay of execution expires or is vacated.

(2)  If the foreign judgment debtor, upon motion, shows the district court any ground upon which enforcement of a judgment of a district court of this state would be stayed, the court shall stay enforcement of the foreign judgment upon the posting of security in the kind and amount required to stay enforcement of a domestic judgment.

